Texas, session 892, HB320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Sections 46.06(a), (c), and (d), Penal Code, are amended to read as follows: (a)  A person commits an offense if the person: (1)  sells, rents, leases, loans, or gives a handgun to any person knowing that the person to whom the handgun is to be delivered intends to use it unlawfully or in the commission of an unlawful act; (2)  intentionally or knowingly sells, rents, leases, or gives or offers to sell, rent, lease, or give: (A)  to a [any] child younger than 18 years of age a [any firearm,] club, [or] location-restricted knife, or firearm other than a semiautomatic rifle; or (B)  to a person younger than 21 years of age a semiautomatic rifle; (3)  intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly sells a firearm or ammunition for a firearm to any person who is intoxicated; (4)  knowingly sells a firearm or ammunition for a firearm to any person who has been convicted of a felony before the fifth anniversary of the later of the following dates: (A)  the person's release from confinement following conviction of the felony; or (B)  the person's release from supervision under community supervision, parole, or mandatory supervision following conviction of the felony; (5)  sells, rents, leases, loans, or gives a handgun to any person knowing that an active protective order is directed to the person to whom the handgun is to be delivered; (6)  knowingly purchases, rents, leases, or receives as a loan or gift from another a handgun while an active protective order is directed to the actor; or (7)  while prohibited from possessing a firearm under state or federal law, knowingly makes a material false statement on a form that is: (A)  required by state or federal law for the purchase, sale, or other transfer of a firearm; and (B)  submitted to a firearms dealer licensed under 18 U.S.C. Section 923. (c)  It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under Subsection (a)(2)(A) [(a)(2)] that the transfer was to a minor whose parent or the person having legal custody of the minor had given written permission for the sale or, if the transfer was other than a sale, the parent or person having legal custody had given effective consent. (d)  An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor, except that: (1)  an offense under Subsection (a)(2)(A) [(a)(2)] is a state jail felony if the weapon that is the subject of the offense is a handgun; and (2)  an offense under Subsection (a)(2)(B) or (a)(7) is a state jail felony. SECTION 2.  The change in law made by this Act applies only to an offense committed on or after the effective date of this Act. An offense committed before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect on the date the offense was committed, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. For purposes of this section, an offense was committed before the effective date of this Act if any element of the offense occurred before that date. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect October 1, 2025.